California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 statement. The conflict-of-interest statement shall be completed by each regional center governing board member and each regional center employee specified in regulations, including, at a minimum, the executive director, every administrator, every program director, every service coordinator, and every employee who has decisionmaking or policymaking authority or authority to obligate the regional center’s resources.

(f) Every new regional center governing board member and regional center executive director shall complete and file the conflict-of-interest statement described in subdivision (e) with his or her respective governing board within 30 days of being selected, appointed, or elected. Every new regional center employee referenced in subdivision (e) and every current regional center employee referenced in subdivision (e) accepting a new position within the regional center shall complete and file the conflict-of-interest statement with his
 or her respective regional center within 30 days of assuming the position.

(g) Every regional center board member and regional center employee referenced in subdivision (e) shall complete and file the conflict-of-interest statement by August 1 of each year.

(h) Every regional center board member and regional center employee referenced in subdivision (e) shall complete and file a subsequent conflict-of-interest statement upon any change in status that creates a potential or present conflict of interest. For the purposes of this subdivision, a change in status includes, but is not limited to, a change in financial interests, legal commitment, regional center or board position or duties, or both, or outside position or duties, or both, whether compensated or not.

(i) The governing board shall submit a copy of the
 completed conflict-of-interest statements of the governing board members and the regional center executive director to the department within 10 days of receipt of the statements.

(j) A person who knowingly provides false information on a conflict-of-interest statement required by this section shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), in addition to any civil remedies available to the department. An action for a civil penalty under this provision may be brought by the department or any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California.

(k) The director of the regional center shall review the conflict-of-interest statement of each regional center employee referenced in subdivision (e) within 10 days of receipt of the statement. If a potential or present conflict of interest is identified for a regional center
 employee that cannot be eliminated, the regional center shall, within 30 days of receipt of the statement, submit to the department a copy of the conflict-of-interest statement and a plan that proposes mitigation measures, including timeframes and actions the regional center or the employee, or both, will take to mitigate the conflict of interest.

(l) The department and the regional center governing board shall review the conflict-of-interest statement of the regional center executive director and each regional center board member to ensure that no conflicts of interest exist. If a present or potential conflict of interest is identified for a regional center director or a board member that cannot be eliminated, the regional center governing board shall, within 30 days of receipt of the statement, submit to the department and the state council a copy of the conflict-of-interest statement and a plan that proposes mitigation measures, including
 timeframes and actions the regional center governing board or the individual, or both, will take to mitigate the conflict of interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 39.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4626.5.

Each regional center shall submit a conflict-of-interest policy to the department by July 1, 2011, and shall post the policy on its internet website by August 1, 2011. The policy shall do, or comply with, all of the following:

(a) Contain the elements of this section and be consistent with applicable law.

(b) Define conflicts of interest.

(c) Identify positions within the regional center required to complete and file a conflict-of-interest statement.

(d) Facilitate disclosure of information to identify conflicts of interest.

(e) Require candidates for nomination, election, or appointment to a regional center board, and applicants for regional center director to disclose any potential or present conflicts of interest prior to being appointed, elected, or confirmed for hire by the regional center or the regional center governing board.

(f) Require the regional center and its governing board to regularly and consistently monitor and enforce compliance with its conflict-of-interest policy.

(g) Prohibit a regional center employee from accepting a gift or gifts from a service provider, consumer, or consumer’s family member valued over fifteen dollars ($15) per year.

(h) Establish a policy
 prohibiting regional center senior staff from hiring relatives at the center or any ancillary foundation and organization. The policy shall be included in the regional center contract and shall be included in training of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 902, Sec. 4.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4627.

(a) The director of the department shall adopt and enforce conflict-of-interest regulations to ensure that members of the governing board, program policy committee, and employees of the regional center make decisions with respect to the regional centers that are in the best interests of the center’s consumers and families.

(b) The department
 shall monitor and ensure the regional centers’ compliance with this section and Sections 4626 and 4626.5. Failure to disclose information pursuant to these sections and related regulations may be considered grounds for removal from the board or for termination of employment.

(c) The department shall adopt regulations to develop standard conflict-of-interest reporting requirements.

(d) The department shall adopt emergency regulations to implement this section and Sections 4626 and 4626.5 by May 1, 2011. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.9 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from that requirement. For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section
 11346.1 of the Government Code, the 120-day period, as applicable to the effective period of an emergency regulatory action and submission of specified materials to the Office of Administrative Law, is hereby extended to 180 days.

(e) The department shall adopt regulations to implement the terms of subdivision (d) through the regular rulemaking process pursuant to Sections 11346 and 11349.1 of the Government Code within 18 months of the adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 6.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4628.

If, for good reason, a contracting agency is unable to meet all the criteria for a governing board established in this chapter, the director may waive those criteria for a period of time, not to exceed one year, with the approval of the state council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 40.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.

(a) The state shall enter into five-year contracts with regional centers, subject to the annual appropriation of funds by the Legislature.

(b) The contracts shall include a provision requiring each regional center to render services in accordance with applicable provisions of federal and state laws and regulations and written directives from the department.

(c) (1) The contracts shall include statewide annual performance improvement indicators and benchmarks, hereinafter collectively referred to as “performance measures,” developed pursuant to Section 4620.5 and outcome measures that the department determines are necessary to ensure each regional center is complying with the requirement specified in subdivision (b). These performance
 measures shall:

(A) Be specific, measurable, and designed to do all of the following:

(i) Assist individuals to achieve life quality outcomes.

(ii) Achieve meaningful progress above the current baselines.

(iii) Improve timely access to services and supports identified as necessary to meet identified needs, including
 facilitating access to generic services and to culturally and linguistically appropriate services and supports provided by regional centers.

(iv) Measure progress in reducing disparities and improving equity, including in outcomes for individuals receiving regional center services and consistent with equity measures published by the department.

(v) Measure progress, and report outcomes, in implementing
 employment services and supports, which may include, but are not limited to, measures addressing the following:

(I) Establishment of local partnership agreements between regional centers, local educational agencies, and the Department of Rehabilitation districts.

(II) The provision of information to individuals regarding employment services, opportunities for employment, and available supports to achieve integrated competitive employment.

(III) The development of regional center and service provider capacity to improve individuals’ attainment and retention of competitive integrated employment opportunities, through best practices, community outreach and partnerships, informed choice, or improved coordination of entities and policies, including through alignment with the objectives and terms of the interagency agreement described in Section 4868.6.

(vi) Measure progress and report on performance measures to implement programs that incentivize high-quality regional center operations pursuant to Section 4620.5.

(B) Be developed through a public process
 led by the department that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Providing information, in an understandable form, to the community about regional center services and supports, including budget information and baseline data on services and supports and regional center operations.

(ii) Conducting a public meeting where participants can provide input on performance measures and using focus groups or surveys to collect information from the community.

(iii) Circulating a draft of the performance
 measures to the community for input prior to
 a second public meeting where additional public input will be taken and considered before the regional center’s adoption of the measures.

(2) In addition to the performance
 measures utilized pursuant to this section, the department may specify in the contract additional areas of service and support that require development or enhancement by a regional center. In determining those areas, the department shall consider public comments from individuals and
 organizations, the distribution of services and supports within a regional center’s catchment area, and review how the availability of services and supports in the regional center catchment area compares with other regional center catchment areas.

(3) Regional center governing boards may adopt additional performance measures beyond the statewide performance measures at their discretion.

(d) Each contract with a regional center shall specify steps to be taken to ensure contract compliance, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Incentives that encourage regional centers to meet or exceed performance
 measures.

(2) Levels of probationary status for regional centers that do not meet, or are at risk of not meeting, performance measures. The department shall require that corrective action be taken by any regional center that is placed on probation. Corrective action may include, but is not limited to, mandated consultation with designated representatives of the Association of Regional Center Agencies or a contractor, or both. The department shall establish the specific
 timeline for the implementation of corrective action and monitor its implementation. When a regional center is placed on probation, the department shall provide the state council and the clients’ rights advocate identified in Section 4433 with a copy of the correction plan, timeline, and any other action taken by the department relating to the probationary status of the regional center, for their review and feedback.

(e) In order to evaluate the regional center’s compliance with its contract performance
 measures and legal obligations related to those measures,
 the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Annually assess each regional center’s achievement of its previous year’s performance measures and make the assessment, including baseline data and performance measures of the individual regional centers, available to the public. The department may make a special commendation of the regional centers that have best engaged the community in the development of contract performance
 measures and have made the most meaningful progress in meeting or exceeding contract performance measures.

(2) Regularly monitor the activities of the regional center to ensure compliance with the provisions of its contracts, including, but not limited to, reviewing status relative to the established performance measures, including all of the following:

(A) The regional center’s public process for compliance with the procedures
 set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(B) Each regional center’s performance objectives for compliance with the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c).

(C) Any public comments on regional center performance objectives sent to the department or to the regional centers, and soliciting public input on the public process and final performance standards.

(f) (1) Beginning May 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, each regional center’s governing board shall hold one or more public meetings regarding its prior year’s contract compliance and performance measures
 and outcomes. The meetings may be held separately from meetings held pursuant to Section 4660. The regional center shall provide individuals attending these meetings with data and any associated information to facilitate discussion and community input. Regional centers shall inform the department that a meeting has been scheduled at least 30 days prior to the meeting. Notice of the meetings shall also be posted on the regional center’s internet website at least 30 days prior to the meeting and shall be sent to regional center consumers and families and individual stakeholders at least 30 days prior to the meeting. Each regional center, in holding the meetings required by this subdivision, shall ensure that the meetings and meeting materials provide language access, as required by state and federal law, and shall schedule the meetings at times and locations designed to promote attendance by the public. To encourage participation by diverse language, racial, and ethnic communities, the
 regional center shall consider strategies to promote opportunities for public comment.

(2) Each regional center governing board shall report to the department regarding the outcomes of each public meeting held pursuant to paragraph (1) within 90 days of the meeting. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, both of the following:

(A) Copies of minutes from each meeting and comments obtained from other strategies utilized to provide opportunities for public comment from diverse language, racial, and ethnic communities.

(B) The regional center’s recommendations and a plan to address areas where improvement is needed.

(g) The renewal of each contract shall be contingent upon compliance with the contract, including, but not limited to, the
 performance
 measures, and achievement of sufficient progress towards meeting the requirements of any corrective action plan imposed by the state, as determined through the department’s evaluation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 33.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.5.

(a) In addition to the requirements set forth in Section 4629, the department’s contract with a regional center shall require the regional center to adopt, maintain, and post on its internet website a board-approved policy regarding transparency and access to public information. The transparency and public information policy shall provide for timely public access to information, including, but not limited to, information regarding requests for proposals and contract awards, service provider rates, documentation related to establishment of negotiated rates, audits, and IRS Form 990. The transparency and public information policy shall be in compliance with applicable law relating to the confidentiality of consumer service information and records, including, but not limited to, Section 4514.

(b) To promote transparency, each regional center shall include on its internet website, as expeditiously as possible, at least all of the following:

(1) Regional center annual independent audits.

(2) Biannual fiscal audits conducted by the department.

(3) Regional center annual reports pursuant to Section 4639.5.

(4) Contract awards, including the organization or entity awarded the contract, and the amount and purpose of the award.

(5) Purchase of service policies and any other policies, guidelines, or regional center-developed assessment tools used to determine the transportation, personal assistant, or independent or
 supported living service needs of a consumer.

(6) The names, types of service, and contact information of all vendors, except consumers or family members of consumers.

(7) Board meeting agendas and approved minutes of open meetings of the board and all committees of the board.

(8) Bylaws of the regional center governing board.

(9) The annual performance contract and yearend performance contract entered into with the department pursuant to this division.

(10) The biannual Home and Community-based Services Waiver program review conducted by the department and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(11) The board-approved
 transparency and public information policy.

(12) The board-approved conflict-of-interest policy.

(13) Reports required pursuant to Section 4639.5.

(14) A link to the page on the department’s internet website, specified in subdivision (d).

(15) The salaries, wages, and employee benefits for all managerial positions for which the primary purpose is the administrative management of the regional center, including, but not limited to, directors and chief executive officers.

(16) Regional center-specific reports generated pursuant to, and for the purposes of, subdivision (h) of Section 4571. 

(c) The
 department shall establish and maintain a transparency portal on its internet website that allows consumers, families, advocates, and others to access provider and regional center information. Posted information on the department’s internet website transparency portal shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A link to each regional center’s internet website information referenced in subdivision (b).

(2) Biannual fiscal audits conducted by the department.

(3) Vendor audits.

(4) Biannual Home and Community-based Services Waiver program reviews conducted by the department and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(5) Biannual targeted case management
 program and federal nursing home reform program reviews conducted by the department.

(6) Early Start Program reviews conducted by the department.

(7) Annual performance contract and year-end performance contract reports.

(d) The department shall establish and maintain a page on its internet website that includes both a list of services purchased by regional centers or provided directly to consumers by regional centers and a brief description of those services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 17.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all regional center contracts or agreements with service providers in which rates are determined through negotiations between the regional center and the service provider shall expressly require that not more than 15 percent of regional center funds be spent on administrative costs. For purposes of this subdivision, direct service expenditures are those costs immediately associated with the services to consumers being
 offered by the provider. Funds spent on direct services shall not include any administrative costs. Administrative costs include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Salaries, wages, and employee benefits for managerial personnel whose primary purpose is the administrative management of the entity, including, but not limited to, directors and chief executive officers.

(2) Salaries, wages, and benefits of employees who perform administrative functions, including, but not limited to, payroll management, personnel functions, accounting, budgeting, and facility management.

(3) Facility and occupancy costs, directly associated with administrative functions.

(4) Maintenance and repair.

(5) Data processing and computer support services.

(6) Contract and procurement activities, except those provided by a direct service employee.

(7) Training directly associated with administrative functions.

(8) Travel directly associated with administrative functions.

(9) Licenses directly associated with administrative functions.

(10) Taxes.

(11) Interest.

(12) Property insurance.

(13) Personal liability insurance directly associated with administrative functions.

(14) Depreciation.

(15) General expenses, including, but not limited to, communication costs and supplies directly associated with administrative functions.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all contracts between the department and the regional centers shall require that not more than 15 percent of all funds appropriated through the regional center’s operations budget shall be spent on administrative costs. For purposes of this subdivision, “direct services” includes, but is not limited to, service coordination, assessment and diagnosis, monitoring of consumer services, quality assurance, and clinical services. Funds spent on direct services shall not include any administrative costs. For purposes of this subdivision, administrative costs include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Salaries, wages, and employee benefits for managerial personnel whose primary purpose is the administrative management of the regional center, including, but not limited to, directors and chief executive officers.

(2) Salaries, wages, and benefits of employees who perform administrative functions, including, but not limited to, payroll management, personnel functions, accounting, budgeting, auditing, and facility management.

(3) Facility and occupancy costs, directly associated with administrative functions.

(4) Maintenance and repair.

(5) Data processing and computer support services.

(6) Contract and procurement
 activities, except those performed by direct service employees.

(7) Training directly associated with administrative functions.

(8) Travel directly associated with administrative functions.

(9) Licenses directly associated with administrative functions.

(10) Taxes.

(11) Interest.

(12) Property insurance.

(13) Personal liability insurance directly associated with administrative functions.

(14) Depreciation.

(15) General expenses,
 including, but not limited to, communication costs and supplies directly associated with administrative functions.

(c) Consistent with subdivision (a), service providers and contractors, upon request, shall provide regional centers with access to any books, documents, papers, computerized data, source documents, consumer records, or other records pertaining to the service providers’ and contractors’ negotiated rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 8.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4630.

The contract between the state and the contracting agency shall not:

(a) Require information that violates client confidentiality.

(b) Prevent a regional center from employing innovative programs, techniques, or staffing arrangements which may reasonably be expected to enhance program effectiveness.

(c) Contain provisions which impinge upon the legal rights of private corporations chartered under California statutes.

(d) Prevent the right of employees of a regional center to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the state’s authority to contract within available funds pursuant to Section 4621 or to obligate the state to appropriate funds in excess of those appropriated in the then current Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

4631.

(a) In order to provide to the greatest extent practicable a larger degree of uniformity and consistency in the services, funding, and administrative practices of regional centers throughout the state, the State Department of Developmental Services shall, in consultation with the regional centers, adopt regulations prescribing a uniform accounting system, a uniform budgeting and encumbrancing system, a systematic approach to administrative practices and procedures, and a uniform reporting system which shall include:

(1) Number and costs of diagnostic services provided by each regional center.

(2) Number and costs of services by service category purchased by each regional center.

(3) All other administrative costs of each regional center.

(b) The department’s contract with a regional center shall require strict accountability and reporting of all revenues and expenditures, and strict accountability and reporting as to the effectiveness of the regional center in carrying out its program and fiscal responsibilities as established herein.

(c) The Director of Developmental Services shall publish a report of the financial status of all regional centers and their operations by February 28 of each year. At a
 minimum, the report shall include each regional center’s budget and actual expenditures for the previous fiscal year and each center’s budget and projected expenditures for the current fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 171, Sec. 23.   Effective August 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4632.

If the department and a regional center are unable to resolve any contract dispute, including disputes between the regional center and the department over whether a contract should be renewed or continued, either party may request the state council to review and advise with regard to the issues in dispute. The state council shall review and shall provide its advice in writing within 30 days of receiving a request for such review and advice. Copies of the state council’s advice shall be transmitted to the Director of Developmental Services and the governing board of the regional center. The state council’s advice shall not be
 binding upon either party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4633.

If the department or any regional center intends to adopt any material change in policy which will have a direct effect upon the contract between the state and the regional center, the department or the regional center shall give at least 30 days’ notice of an intent to change policy, and, if necessary, the contract between the state and such regional center shall be amended. The department shall not require regional centers to provide or purchase any services beyond the level of the funding appropriation for such services. If the department should alter the rates of payments to providers, the regional center budget shall be adjusted accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4634.

Contracts between the department and regional center shall be presented for final negotiation to regional center governing boards at least 90 days’ prior to the effective date of such contracts. A regional center shall not be expected to perform functions not specified in the contract without a revision of such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4635.

(a) If any regional center finds that it is unable to comply with the requirements of this division or its contract with the state, the regional center shall be responsible for informing the department immediately that it does not expect to fulfill its contractual obligations. Failure to provide the notification to the department in a timely manner shall constitute grounds for possible revocation or nonrenewal of the contract. If any regional center makes a decision to cancel or not renew its contract with the department, the regional center shall give a minimum of 90 days’ written notice of its decision.

(b) (1) If the department finds that any regional center
 is not fulfilling its contractual obligations, the department shall make reasonable efforts to resolve the problem within a reasonable period of time with the cooperation of the regional center, including the action described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 4629 or renegotiation of the contract.

(2) If the department’s efforts to resolve the problem are not successful, the department shall issue a letter of noncompliance. The letter of noncompliance shall state the noncompliant activities and establish a specific timeline for the development and implementation of a corrective action plan. The department shall approve the plan and monitor its implementation. Letters of noncompliance shall be made available to the public upon request. The letter of noncompliance shall not include privileged or confidential consumer information or information that would violate the privacy rights of regional center board members or employees. The
 department shall notify the state council and shall provide the state council with a copy of the corrective action plan, the timeline, and any other action taken by the department relating to the requirements for corrective action.

(c) If the department finds that any regional center continues to fail in fulfilling its contractual obligations after reasonable efforts have been made, and finds that other regional centers are able to fulfill similar obligations under similar contracts, and finds that it will be in the best interest of the persons being served by the regional center, the department shall take steps to terminate the contract and to negotiate with another governing board to provide regional center services in the area. These findings may also constitute grounds for possible nonrenewal of the contract in addition to, or in lieu of, other grounds.

(d) If the department
 makes a decision to cancel or not renew its contract with the regional center, the department shall give a minimum of 90 days’ written notice of its decision, unless it has determined that the 90 days’ notice would jeopardize the health or safety of the regional center’s consumers, or constitutes willful misuse of state funds, as determined by the Attorney General. Within 14 days after receipt of the notice, the regional center may make a written protest to the department of the decision to terminate or not renew the contract. In that case, the department shall: (1) arrange to meet with the regional center and the state council within 30 days after receipt of the protest to discuss the decision and to provide its rationale for the termination or nonrenewal of the contract, and to discuss any feasible alternatives to termination or nonrenewal, including the possibility of offering a limited term contract of less than one fiscal year; and (2) initiate the procedures for resolving disputes contained in Section
 4632. To the extent allowable under state and federal law, any outstanding audit exceptions or other deficiency reports, appeals, or protests shall be made available and subject to discussion at the meeting arranged under clause (1).

(e) When terminating or not renewing a regional center contract and negotiating with another governing board for a regional center contract, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, all personnel employed by the regional center, all service providers to the regional center, and all consumers of the regional center informing them that it proposes to terminate or not renew the contract with the regional center, and that the state will continue to fulfill its obligations to ensure a continuity of services, as required by state law, through a contract with a new governing board.

(2) Issue a request for proposals prior to selecting and negotiating with another governing board for a regional center contract. The state council shall review all proposals and make recommendations to the department.

(3) Request the state council and any other community agencies to assist the state by locating or organizing a new governing board to contract with the department to operate the regional center in the area. The state council shall cooperate with the department when that assistance is requested.

(4) Provide any assistance that may be required to ensure that the transfer of responsibility to a new regional center will be accomplished with minimum disruption to the clients of the service program.

(f) In no event shall the procedures for
 termination or nonrenewal of a regional center contract limit or abridge the state’s authority to contract with any duly authorized organization for the purpose of service delivery, nor shall these procedures be interpreted to represent a continued contractual obligation beyond the limits of any fiscal year contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 42.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4636.

(a) If necessary, to avoid disruption of the service program, the department may directly, or through contract, operate a regional center during the interim period between the termination of its contract with one governing board and the assumption of operating responsibility by a regional center contract with another governing board.
 The department may, if requested by the new governing board,
 arrange for additional assistance to avoid disruption of the service program, until such time as the new governing board has assumed full responsibility for the operation of the program.

(b) The department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing every six months of progress in transitioning to a new governing board, until the transition is complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 34.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4638.

Non-profit corporations operating regional centers shall not use state funds allocated to the corporation for operating the center for activities directly related to influencing employees of the center regarding their decision to organize or not to organize and to form a union or to join an existing union because these activities are not directly related to the purchase of services to clients. State funds shall not be used for these activities by the officers or employees of the corporation itself, by the officers or employees of the regional center, or by an independent contractor, consultant or attorney.

State funds shall not be used to litigate the issue of the application of the National Labor Relations Act to, nor the jurisdiction of the National Labor Relations Board over, non-profit corporations operating regional centers.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the employers rights under Section 8(c) of the National Labor Relations Act. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the use of state funds by the regional center in the employment of, or for contracting for, assistance in good faith collective bargaining or in handling employee grievances, including arbitration, under an employee-employer contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 200.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.

(a) The governing board of a regional center shall annually contract with an independent accounting firm for an audited financial statement. The audit report and accompanying management letter shall be reviewed and approved by the regional center board and submitted to the department within 60 days of completion and before April 1 of each year. Upon submission to the department, the audit report and
 accompanying management letter shall be made available to the public by the regional center. It is the intent of the Legislature that no additional funds be appropriated for this purpose.

(b) For the 2011–12 fiscal year and subsequent years, the audit specified in subdivision (a) shall not be completed by the same accounting firm more than five times in every 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 9.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.5.

(a) By December 1 of each year, each regional center shall provide a listing to the State Department of Developmental Services a complete current salary schedule for all personnel classifications used by the regional center. The information shall be provided in a format prescribed by the department. The department shall provide this information to the public upon request. From February 1, 2009, to June 30, 2010, inclusive, the requirements of this subdivision shall not apply.

(b) By December 1 of each year, each regional center shall report information to the
 department on all prior fiscal year expenditures from the regional center operations budget for all administrative services, including managerial, consultant, accounting, personnel, labor relations, and legal services, whether procured under a written contract or otherwise. Expenditures for the maintenance, repair, or purchase of equipment or property shall not be required to be reported for purposes of this subdivision. The report shall be prepared in a format prescribed by the department and shall include, at a minimum, for each recipient the amount of funds expended, the type of service, and purpose of the expenditure. The department shall provide this information to the public upon request. Regional centers shall not be required to prepare or submit the report required by this subdivision in 2009.

(c) Beginning July 1,